Massachusetts, session 194th, S2485.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 26 of Chapter 31 of the general laws is hereby amended by striking out the third
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following:- The administrator may require any
disabled veteran to present a certificate of a physician, approved by the administrator, that his
disability is not such as to incapacitate him from the performance of the duties of the position for
which he is eligible. The cost of a physical examination of such veteran for the purpose of
obtaining such certificate shall be borne by the commonwealth. Notwithstanding the
administrator's right to require a physician's certificate in the case of a disabled veteran, an
appointing authority shall not require, request or accept an individual's military medical record or
military personnel service record for the purpose of employment; provided, however, that an
appointing authority may require, request or accept the individual's DD–214 form. An appointing
authority shall not impose a term or condition on an individual as a condition of obtaining or
of 2

retaining employment if compliance with the term or condition would require the individual to
present the individual's military medical record or military personnel service record as set forth
in this paragraph; provided, however, that an appointing authority may impose a term or
condition requiring the individual to present the individual's DD–214 form. Nothing in this
section shall prohibit an appointing authority to require military service records if the condition
stated on the individual's DD–214 form is other than honorable. This paragraph shall apply to all
civil and non-civil service municipalities’ hiring authorities.
of 2